Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.14B RCW to read as follows:(1) A county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains with a population between 530,000 and 1,500,000 receiving tax revenues under this chapter that operates a regional 911 emergency communications system must transfer a portion of the county 911 excise tax revenues received under RCW 82.14B.030 (1), (2), and (3) to the corresponding local government operating a municipal public safety answering point or receiving calls transferred from the regional 911 emergency communications system for disposition and dispatch. The portion of the county 911 excise tax to be transferred by a county operating a regional 911 communications system is the same percentage used for the tax imposed pursuant to RCW 82.14.420 (7) and (8).(2) Beginning in calendar year 2026, the amount calculated in subsection (1) of this section must be transferred quarterly by the county operating the regional 911 emergency communications system to the corresponding local government operating a municipal public safety answering point or receiving calls transferred from the regional 911 emergency communications system to a municipal public safety answering point for disposition and dispatch for the quarter.(3) For the purposes of this section, "regional 911 emergency communications system" means a 911 emergency communications system operated by a county that is responsible for receiving incoming 911 emergency calls for multiple local government law enforcement and fire response agencies.--- END ---